Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB912.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2302(2) and (4) of Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 2302. Policy.The General Assembly finds and declares that:* * *(2) Several states have enacted laws requiring persons arrested, charged or convicted of certain crimes, especially sex offenses, to provide genetic samples for DNA profiling.* * *(4) It is in the best interest of the Commonwealth to establish a DNA data base and a DNA data bank containing DNA 123456789101112131415161718192021 samples submitted by individuals arrested for, charged with, convicted of, adjudicated delinquent for or accepted into ARD for criminal homicide, felony sex offenses and other specified offenses and containing DNA samples collected as part of an investigation into missing persons or unidentified decedents.* * *Section 2. The definition of "other specified offense" in section 2303 of Title 44 is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 2303. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Criminal homicide." An offense under any of the following , or an attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit any of the following:(1) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2501 (relating to criminal homicide).(2) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502 (relating to murder).(3) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2503 (relating to voluntary manslaughter).(4) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2504 (relating to involuntary manslaughter).(5) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2505 (relating to causing or aiding suicide), if the offense is graded as a felony.(6) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2506 (relating to drug delivery resulting in death).(7) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2507 (relating to criminal homicide of law enforcement officer).20250SB0912PN1088 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Other specified offense." Any of the following, or an attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit any of the following:(1) A felony offense, other than criminal homicide or a felony sex offense.(2) (Reserved).(3) (Reserved).(4) An offense under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) or 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles) that is graded as a misdemeanor of the first degree.(5) A misdemeanor offense requiring registration under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H (relating to registration of sexual offenders).(6) An offense graded as a misdemeanor of the second degree under any of the following:18 Pa.C.S. § 2701 (relating to simple assault).18 Pa.C.S. § 2903 (relating to false imprisonment).18 Pa.C.S. § 3127 (relating to indecent exposure).18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 39 (relating to theft and related offenses). 18 Pa.C.S. § 4105 (relating to bad checks).18 Pa.C.S. § 4106 (relating to access device fraud).18 Pa.C.S. § 4952 (relating to intimidation of witnesses or victims).18 Pa.C.S. § 4953 (relating to retaliation against witness, victim or party).18 Pa.C.S. § 4958 (relating to intimidation, retaliation or obstruction in child abuse cases).18 Pa.C.S. § 5121 (relating to escape).20250SB0912PN1088 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 18 Pa.C.S. § 5126 (relating to flight to avoid apprehension, trial or punishment).18 Pa.C.S. § 5131 (relating to recruiting criminal gang members).18 Pa.C.S. § 5510 (relating to abuse of corpse).18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 55 Subch. B (relating to cruelty to animals).18 Pa.C.S. § 5902 (relating to prostitution and related offenses).* * *Section 3. Sections 2312, 2314(b), 2316 and 2317(a)(1) introductory paragraph of Title 44 are amended to read:§ 2312. State DNA Data Base.A Statewide DNA Data Base is reestablished within the State Police to store forensic DNA profiles and records developed by or submitted to the State Police under the former DNA Act, the former provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 47 (relating to DNA data and testing) or this chapter, and to contribute forensic DNA profiles and records to CODIS, the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System and the national DNA identification index system. The State DNA Data Base shall have the capability provided by computer software and procedures administered by the State Police to store and maintain forensic DNA profiles and records related to:(1) forensic casework;(2) [convicted or delinquency adjudicated offenders] persons required to provide a DNA sample under this chapter;(3) anonymous DNA records used for statistical research on the frequency of DNA genotypes, quality control or the development of new DNA identification methods; and20250SB0912PN1088 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) missing persons and unidentified decedents.§ 2314. State Police recommendation of additional offenses and annual report.* * *(b) Annual report.--No later than August 1 of each year, the commissioner shall submit to the Governor's Office, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives a written report containing information regarding the collection and testing of DNA samples under the provisions of this chapter. The report must include, but need not be limited to, the following information pertaining to the previous fiscal year:(1) The age, race and sex of those [convicted] from whom DNA samples were submitted [upon conviction] under this chapter.(2) The fiscal impact on the State Police of collecting and testing DNA samples from persons [convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for offenses.] required to provide a DNA sample under this chapter.(3) The average length of time between the receipt of DNA samples [from those convicted of offenses] and the completion of forensic DNA testing of each of those categories of DNA samples.(3.1) The number of DNA samples expunged from the State DNA Data Base.(4) Recommendations, if any, under this section for the inclusion of additional offenses for which DNA samples must be collected or recommendations for the removal of specific offenses from the categories requiring the collection of DNA 20250SB0912PN1088 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 samples from arrestees or persons convicted of crimes.§ 2316. DNA sample required [upon conviction, delinquency adjudication and certain ARD cases].(a) [General rule.--] Conviction or adjudication.--A person who is convicted or adjudicated delinquent for criminal homicide, a felony sex offense or other specified offense or who is or remains incarcerated for a felony sex offense or other specified offense on or after the effective date of this chapter shall have a DNA sample collected as follows:(1) A person who is sentenced or receives a delinquency disposition to a term of confinement for an offense covered by this subsection shall have a DNA sample collected upon intake to a prison, jail or juvenile detention facility or any other detention facility or institution. If the person is already confined at the time of sentencing or adjudication, the person shall have a DNA sample collected immediately after the sentencing or adjudication. If a DNA sample is not timely collected in accordance with this section, the DNA sample may be collected any time thereafter by the prison, jail, juvenile detention facility, detention facility or institution.(2) A person who is convicted or adjudicated delinquent for an offense covered by this subsection shall have a DNA sample collected as a condition for any sentence or adjudication which disposition will not involve an intake into a prison, jail, juvenile detention facility or any other detention facility or institution.(3) Under no circumstances shall a person who is convicted or adjudicated delinquent for an offense covered by this subsection be released in any manner after such 20250SB0912PN1088 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disposition unless and until a DNA sample and fingerprints have been collected.(b) Condition of release, probation or parole.--(1) A person who has been convicted or adjudicated delinquent for criminal homicide, a felony sex offense or other specified offense and who serves a term of confinement in connection therewith after June 18, 2002, shall not be released in any manner unless and until a DNA sample has been collected.(2) This chapter shall apply to incarcerated persons convicted or adjudicated delinquent for criminal homicide, a felony sex offense or other specified offense prior to June 19, 2002.(3) The following shall apply:(i) Except as provided under subparagraph (ii), this chapter shall apply to incarcerated persons and persons on probation or parole who were convicted or adjudicated delinquent for criminal homicide, a felony sex offense or other specified offenses prior to the effective date of this paragraph.(ii) Subparagraph (i) shall not apply to persons convicted or adjudicated delinquent of an offense enumerated under paragraph (4) or (6) of the definition of "other specified offense" in section 2303 (relating to definitions).(c) Certain ARD cases.--Acceptance into ARD as a result of a criminal charge for criminal homicide, a felony sex offense or other specified offense, other than an offense enumerated under paragraph (4) or (6) of the definition of "other specified offense" in section 2303 filed after June 18, 2002, [may] shall 20250SB0912PN1088 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be conditioned upon the collection of a DNA sample.(c.1) Arrest.--Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who is arrested for a specified offense on or after the effective date of this subsection shall have a DNA sample collected as follows:(1) A person who is arrested in this Commonwealth for criminal homicide shall have a DNA sample collected at the time fingerprints are collected under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9112 (relating to mandatory fingerprinting). The collected DNA sample shall be submitted to the State Police within 48 hours in a manner prescribed by rules, regulations and guidelines promulgated under section 2318 (relating to procedures for conduct, disposition and use of DNA analysis). The person may not be released until a DNA sample and fingerprints are collected.(2) A person who is arrested in this Commonwealth for a felony sex offense shall have a DNA sample collected at the time fingerprints are collected under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9112. The collected DNA sample shall be submitted to the State Police within 48 hours in a manner prescribed by rules, regulations and guidelines promulgated under section 2318. The person may not be released until a DNA sample and fingerprints are collected.(3) A person who is arrested in this Commonwealth for an offense listed under paragraph (1), (4) or (5) of the definition of "other specified offense" in section 2303 shall have a DNA sample collected at the time fingerprints are collected under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9112. The collected DNA sample shall be submitted to the State Police within 48 hours in a manner prescribed by rules, regulations and guidelines 20250SB0912PN1088 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 promulgated under section 2318. The person may not be released until a DNA sample and fingerprints are collected.(c.2) Limitations.--(1) Subsection (c.1) shall not apply to a criminal proceeding in which the person who is the subject of the criminal proceeding is not arrested and is instead proceeded against by summons.(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preclude the collection of DNA otherwise authorized by this chapter.(d) Supervision of DNA samples.--All DNA samples collected pursuant to this section shall be collected in accordance with rules, regulations and guidelines promulgated by the State Police in consultation with the Department of Corrections.(d.1) Mandatory submission.--The requirements of this chapter are mandatory and apply regardless of whether a court advises a person that a DNA sample must be provided to the State DNA Data Base and the State DNA Data Bank as a result of [a] an arrest, conviction or adjudication of delinquency. A person who has been sentenced to death or life imprisonment without the possibility of parole or to any term of incarceration is not exempt from the requirements of this chapter. Any person subject to this chapter who has not provided a DNA sample for any reason, including because of an oversight or error, shall provide a DNA sample for inclusion in the State DNA Data Base and the State DNA Data Bank after being notified by authorized law enforcement or corrections personnel. If a person provides a DNA sample which is not adequate for any reason, the person shall provide another DNA sample for inclusion in the State DNA Data Base and the State DNA Data Bank after being notified by 20250SB0912PN1088 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorized law enforcement or corrections personnel. The DNA sample may be collected under this chapter but shall not be required if the authorized law enforcement or corrections official confirms that a DNA sample from the person has already been validly collected and provided to the State DNA Data Bank and a DNA record for the person exists in the State DNA Data Base.(e) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "released" means any release, parole, furlough, work release, bail, prerelease or release in any other manner from a prison, jail, juvenile detention facility or any other place of confinement.§ 2317. Procedures for collection and transmission of DNA samples.(a) Collection of DNA samples.--(1) Each DNA sample required to be collected pursuant to sections 2316 (relating to DNA sample required [upon conviction, delinquency adjudication and certain ARD cases]) and 2316.1 (relating to collection from persons accepted from other jurisdictions) shall be collected as follows:* * *Section 4. Section 2319 of Title 44 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2319. DNA data base exchange.* * *(d) Separate category.--The State Police shall create a separate category within the State DNA Data Base to store DNA samples and records collected upon arrest under section 2316(c.1) (relating to DNA sample required).Section 5. Sections 2321(b.1) and 2322 of Title 44 are 20250SB0912PN1088 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amended to read:§ 2321. Expungement.* * *(b.1) Expungement by court order.--The following shall apply:(1) Except as provided under [paragraph (2)] paragraphs (2) and (3), a person may request the court of common pleas of the county where the original charges were filed or where the arrest for which the DNA sample, record or profile was made to issue an order directing the expungement of the DNA sample, record or profile pertaining to the person in the State DNA Data Bank or the State DNA Data Base in the following instances:(i) the conviction or delinquency adjudication for which the person's DNA sample was collected has been reversed and no appeal is pending;(i.1) the charge for which the DNA sample was taken has been dismissed, no appeal is pending and the prosecuting authority is barred from further prosecution;(i.2) there has been a judgment of acquittal on the charge for which the DNA sample was taken and no further appeal is pending;(i.3) the person from whom the DNA sample was taken was not charged with a crime for which a DNA sample is authorized to be taken under this chapter;(i.4) the prosecuting authority has expressly declined to prosecute the charge for which the DNA sample was taken;(i.5) the charge for which the DNA sample was taken was not filed within the statute of limitations;20250SB0912PN1088 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) the person was granted an unconditional pardon for the crime for which the DNA sample was taken; or(iii) the DNA sample, record or profile was included in the State DNA Data Bank or State DNA Data Base by mistake and the State Police has erroneously refused to grant the person's request for removal under subsection (b).(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if the person has been arrested, convicted or adjudicated delinquent for any other crime for which a DNA sample is required to be collected under this chapter.(3) The court shall give [10] 30 days' prior notice to the district attorney of the county where the original charges were filed of an application for expungement under this subsection.(4) Notwithstanding any other law or rule of court, the court shall have no authority to order the expungement of a DNA sample, record or profile in the State DNA Data Bank or the State DNA Data Base except as provided under this subsection.* * *§ 2322. Mandatory cost.Unless the court finds that undue hardship would result, a mandatory cost of $250, which shall be in addition to any other costs imposed pursuant to statutory authority, shall automatically be assessed on any person convicted, adjudicated delinquent or granted ARD for criminal homicide, a felony sex offense or other specified offense, and all proceeds derived from this section shall be transmitted to the fund.Section 6. This act shall take effect as follows:20250SB0912PN1088 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The addition of 44 Pa.C.S. § 2316(c.1)(2) shall take effect in one year.(2) The addition of 44 Pa.C.S. § 2316(c.1)(3) shall take effect in 18 months.(3) This section shall take effect immediately.(4) The remainder of this act shall take effect in six months.20250SB0912PN1088 - 13 - 1234567